Utah statutes.
53A-20b-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Authority" means the State Charter School Finance Authority created by
this chapter.
(2) (a)  "Obligations" mean any notes, debentures, revenue bonds, or other
evidences of financial indebtedness, except as provided in Subsection (2)(b).
(b)  "Obligations" do not include general obligation bonds.
(3)  "Project" means:
(a)  any building, structure, or property owned, or to be acquired, by a
charter school for any of its educational purposes and the related
appurtenances, easements, rights-of-way, improvements, paving, utilities,
landscaping, parking facilities, and lands; or
(b)  any capital equipment owned, or to be acquired, by a charter school for
any of its educational purposes, interests in land, and grounds, together with
the personal property necessary, convenient, or appurtenant to them.
